Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1216.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4)(xxi) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended and clause (4) is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *123456789101112131415161718 (xxi) Advertising, displaying or offering a price on an event ticket, lodging platform or food delivery platform that does not clearly and conspicuously display the total price at the point in the shopping experience when the consumer is first shown the product or service, including each mandatory fee or charge that does not vary by consumer choice, or that does not clearly or conspicuously display each mandatory fee or charge associated with the sale of the product or service prior to purchase, except for taxes imposed by a government entity. As used in this subclause:(XXI) ADVERTISING, DISPLAYING OR OFFERING BY ANY PERSON, BUSINESS OR OTHER ENTITY A PRICE THROUGH THE USE OF A PRIMARY TICKET PLATFORM, SECONDARY TICKET PLATFORM, ACCOMMODATIONS BOOKING PLATFORM, HOMESTAY PLATFORM, HOTEL PLATFORM, LODGING PLATFORM OR FOOD DELIVERY PLATFORM THAT DOES NOT PROMINENTLY DISPLAY THE TOTAL PRICE WHEN THE CONSUMER IS FIRST SHOWN THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE, INCLUDING EACH MANDATORY FEE OR CHARGE THAT DOES NOT VARY BY CONSUMER CHOICES, EXCEPT FOR ANY TAXES OR FEES IMPOSED ON THE CONSUMER BY A GOVERNMENT ENTITY OR ASSESSMENT FEES OF A GOVERNMENT-CREATED SPECIAL DISTRICT OR PROGRAM. EACH MANDATORY FEE OR CHARGE ASSOCIATED WITH THE SALE OF THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE, INCLUDING ANY TAXES OR FEES IMPOSED ON THE CONSUMER BY A GOVERNMENT ENTITY OR ASSESSMENT FEES OF A GOVERNMENT-CREATED SPECIAL DISTRICT OR PROGRAM, SHALL BE PROMINENTLY DISPLAYED PRIOR TO PURCHASE. AS USED IN THIS SUBCLAUSE:(A) "Accommodations booking platform" means a business that operates or provides an Internet website, software application for a mobile device or other digital platform for the purpose of searching for hotel rooms and homestays for consumers to purchase RENT . 20250HB1216PN1949 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) "Food delivery platform" means a business that operates or provides an Internet website, software application for a mobile device or other digital platform for the purpose of facilitating the delivery of food and beverages to consumers. The term shall not include direct delivery from a retail food establishment or retail food facility as those terms are defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 5702 (relating to definitions).(C) "Homestay platform" means a business that operates or provides an Internet website software application for a mobile device or other digital platform on which, in exchange for a fee or other charge, an owner or lessee of a residential unit or a room or space in a residential unit may advertise and conduct a transaction for the rental of the unit or room or space for the purposes of temporary lodging.(D) "Hotel platform" means a hotel as defined in section 209 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971," that operates or provides an Internet website, software application for a mobile device or other digital platform for the purpose of renting rooms for temporary lodging.(E) "Lodging platform" means an accommodations booking platform, hotel platform or homestay platform.(F) "Primary ticket platform" means a business that operates or provides an Internet website, software application for a mobile device or other digital platform for the purpose of selling or facilitating the sale of tickets to purchasers.(G) "Secondary ticket platform" means a business that operates or provides an Internet website, software application for a mobile device or other digital platform for the purpose of reselling or facilitating the resale of tickets to purchasers, 20250HB1216PN1949 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including a primary ticketing platform to the extent that the platform is engaged in reselling or facilitating the resale of tickets to purchasers.(H) "Ticket" means a printed, electronic or other license issued by a primary ticket platform or secondary ticket platform for admission to an event at the date and time specified on the ticket.[(xxi)] (xxii) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.* * *Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by subclauses (i) through [(xxi)] (xxii) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1216PN1949 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627